Utah statutes.
34-29-13.   Statements to be furnished applicants.

Every person securing information or intelligence from an employment agent relative to hiring or engagement to work for others as provided in Section 34-29-1 shall be furnished a written copy, in duplicate, of the terms of such hiring or engagement, by the employment agent, showing the amount of commissions or fees paid to such employment agent, the kind of service to be performed, the rate of wages or compensation, the length of time, if definite, and if indefinite, so stated, of such service, with full name and address of the person authorizing the hiring of such person. One of these copies shall be delivered to the person for whom the labor is to be performed and the other shall be retained by the person furnished with the information or intelligence; and the agent issuing the written copy of the conditions of service or employment shall make and keep in a book provided for the purpose a third copy of the same. Any person engaged in the business of keeping an employment office who fails to observe the provisions of this section shall be subject to the penalties provided in Section 34-29-15.



Enacted by Chapter 85, 1969 General Session

